Hawaii statutes.
[§431:11A-104] Disclosure. Prior to
the effective date of the policy, the controlling producer shall deliver
written notice to the prospective insured disclosing the relationship between
the controlling producer and the controlled insurer; except that, if the
business is placed through a subproducer who is not a controlling producer, the
controlling producer shall retain in the controlling producer's records a
signed statement from the subproducer that the subproducer is aware of the
relationship between the controlled insurer and the controlling producer and a
written commitment that the subproducer has or will notify the insured of that
relationship. [L 1992, c 176, pt of §1]

Previous
Vol09_Ch0431-0435H
Next